Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. Recounts.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 39, 75.

§ 24.2-800.
Recounts in all elections.

The provisions of this article apply to all elections held in the Commonwealth.

When there is between any candidate apparently nominated or elected and any candidate apparently defeated a difference of not more than one percent of the total vote cast for the two such candidates as determined by the State Board or the electoral board, the defeated candidate may appeal from the determination of the State Board or the electoral board for a recount of the vote as set forth in this article. When there is between any write-in candidate apparently nominated or elected and any candidate apparently defeated, or between any candidate apparently nominated or elected and any write-in candidate apparently defeated, a difference of not more than five percent of the total vote cast for the two such candidates as determined by the State Board or the electoral board, the defeated candidate may appeal from the determination of the State Board or the electoral board for a recount of the vote as set forth in this article. In an election of electors for the President and Vice President of the United States, the presidential candidate shall represent the vice presidential candidate and slate of electors and be the party to the recount for purposes of this article.

When there is between the vote for a question and the vote against a question a difference of not more than 50 votes or one percent of the total vote cast for and against the question as determined by the State Board or the electoral board, whichever is greater, 50 or more voters qualified to vote on the question, by signing and filing their petition, may appeal from the determination of the State Board or the electoral board for a recount of the vote as set forth in this article.

History.

1979, c. 293, § 24.1-249; 1981, c. 570; 1993, c. 641; 2009, c. 386; 2019, c. 382; 2020, c. 886.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 386 inserted the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 382 added subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 886 deleted subsection D, which read, “The State Board shall promulgate standards and instructions for the conduct of simultaneous recounts of two or more elections in a single election district” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

§ 24.2-801.
Petition for recount; recount court.

The petition for a recount of an election, other than an election for presidential electors, shall be filed within 10 days from the day the State Board or the electoral board certifies the result of the election under §

24.2-679

or

24.2-671

, but not thereafter. The petition shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond in the case of any statewide office and in the circuit court of the county or city in which the candidate being challenged resides in the case of any other office. The petition shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond in the case of any statewide referendum and in the circuit court of any county or city comprising a part of the election district in the case of any other referendum.

The petition shall set forth the results certified by the State Board or electoral board and shall request the court to have the ballots in the election recounted.

In an election for office, a copy of the petition shall be served on the candidate apparently nominated or elected as provided under §

8.01-296

and within 10 days after the State Board or electoral board has certified the results of such election. In a referendum, a copy of the petition shall be so served on the governing body or chief executive officer of the jurisdiction in which the election was held.

The chief judge of the circuit court in which a petition is filed shall promptly notify the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia, who shall designate two other judges to sit with the chief judge, and the court shall be constituted and sit in all respects as a court appointed and sitting under §§

24.2-805

and

24.2-806

.

History.

1979, c. 293, § 24.1-249; 1981, c. 570; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 268; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, c. 464; 2020, c. 886.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 268 in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “of an election, other than an election for presidential electors,” and substituted “10” for “ten”; and substituted “10” for “ten” in the next-to-last paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and deleted “mechanical or” following “in the case of” in the second paragraph, inserted “recording,” and substituted “machines” for “voting devices.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, in the second paragraph, deleted “or, in the case of direct recording electronic machines, the vote redetermined” from the end.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 886, designated the paragraphs as subsections A through D; substituted “State Board” for “Board” in subsections B and C, and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

§ 24.2-801.1.
Petition for recount of election for presidential electors; recount court.

The petition for a recount of an election for presidential electors shall be filed no later than 5:00 p.m. on the second calendar day after the day the State Board certifies the result of the election under §

24.2-679

, but not thereafter. Presidential candidates who anticipate the possibility of asking for a recount are encouraged to so notify the State Board by letter as soon as possible after election day. The petition shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond. If any presidential candidate is eligible to seek a recount of the results of the election for presidential electors under §

24.2-800

the State Board shall, within 24 hours of the certification of the results, notify the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond and the Supreme Court of Virginia (i) that a recount is possible, (ii) which presidential candidate is eligible to seek a recount, and (iii) of the date the results were certified. The Circuit Court of the City of Richmond shall make arrangements to receive any such filing if the office would normally be closed the entire day, or prior to 5:00 p.m., on the second calendar day after the day the State Board certified the result of the election.

The petition shall set forth the results certified by the State Board and shall request the court to have the ballots in the election recounted.

A copy of the petition shall be served on the presidential candidate whose electors were apparently elected as provided under §

8.01-296

and within five calendar days after the State Board has certified the results of such election.

As soon as a petition is filed, the chief judge of the Circuit Court shall promptly notify the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia, who shall designate two other judges to sit with the chief judge, and the court shall be constituted and sit in all respects as a court appointed and sitting under §

24.2-805

.

Any recount of an election for presidential electors shall be held promptly and completed, in accordance with the provisions of 3 U.S.C. § 5, at least six days before the time fixed for the meeting of the electors.

History.

2003, c. 268; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, c. 464; 2020, c. 886.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and deleted “mechanical or” following “in the case of” in the second paragraph, inserted “recording,” and substituted “machines” for “voting devices.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, in the second paragraph, deleted “or, in the case of direct recording electronic machines, the vote redetermined” from the end.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 886 designated the paragraphs as subsections A through E; and substituted “State Board” for “Board” in subsections B and C.

§ 24.2-802.
Recount standards.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate standards for (i) the proper handling and security of voting systems, ballots, and other materials required for a recount, (ii) accurate counting of votes based upon objective evidence and taking into account the voting system and form of ballots approved for use in the Commonwealth, and (iii) any other matters that will promote a timely and accurate resolution of the recount.

The State Board shall promulgate additional standards and instructions for the conduct of simultaneous recounts of two or more elections in a single election district.

The chief judge of the circuit court or the full recount court may, consistent with State Board of Elections standards, resolve disputes over the application of the standards and direct all other appropriate measures to ensure the proper conduct of the recount.

History.

1979, c. 293, § 24.1-250; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 570; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 461; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641; 2000, cc. 938, 1057; 2001, cc. 639, 641, 646; 2002, cc. 601, 647; 2003, c. 268; 2004, c. 410; 2006, c. 689; 2007, cc. 285, 939, 943; 2008, c. 682; 2011, c. 522; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2015, c. 740; 2016, c. 464; 2019, c. 382; 2020, c. 886.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 639, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall recommend to the General Assembly permanent standards in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A (i) of §

24.2-802

for possible enactment into law at the 2002 Session of the General Assembly. The State Board shall submit its recommendations to the Committee on Privileges and Elections on or before December 1, 2001.”

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

Acts 2007, cc. 939 and 943, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall be authorized to determine the equitable allocation of any federal or state funds made available to implement the provisions of this act among the counties and cities of the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, c. 886 amended this section and recodified much of the section. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission the amendments to this section by Acts 2020, cc. 284 and 500 have been given effect in §

24.2-802.2

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 938 added the third and the final sentences in the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2000 amendments by c. 1057 added the third and fourth sentences in the first paragraph of subsection A; added the third and fourth sentences in the third paragraph of subsection A; added the present second sentence in subsection C; deleted the former sixth sentence in subsection C, which read: “For purposes of redetermining the vote cast by any mechanical or direct electronic voting device that prints returns, the printed return sheets shall be sufficient evidence of the count”; and substituted “After determining all matters pertaining to the recount and redetermination of the vote as raised by the parties,” for “By an appropriate order” at the beginning of the second sentence in the second paragraph of subsection C.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 639 added present subsection A, and redesignated former subsections A through G as present subsections B through H.

The 2001 amendment by c. 641, also added present subsection A, and redesignated former subsections A through G as present subsections B through H; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, deleted the former third sentence, which formerly read: “If the number of absentee votes cast in the election is sufficient to change the result of the election, the petitioner and his counsel and each other party and their counsel, under supervision of the electoral board and its agents, shall also have access to absentee ballots cast in the election for examination purposes,” and inserted “provided that individual ballots cast in the election shall not be examined at the preliminary hearing” at the end of the present third sentence; in subsection D, in the first paragraph, added the second sentence, in the third sentence, substituted “paper ballots cast in the election” for “ballots cast in the election, including paper ballots,” and inserted “undervoted and overvoted,” and substituted “(a)” for “(i)” and “(b)” for “(ii),” and substituted “(1)” for “(i)” and “(2)” for “(ii)” in the second paragraph of subsection D; and substituted “subsection E of this section” for “subsection D of this section” in subsection G.

The 2001 amendment by c. 646 added the second paragraph in subsection C (now subsection D).

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 601 and 647 are identical, and, in subsection A, deleted “on or before September 1, 2001” at the beginning of the first sentence and added the second paragraph; added the fourth paragraph of subsection B; inserted the first sentence in the fifth paragraph of subsection B; rewrote subsection D; deleted “of this section” following “under subsection E” in subsection G; and added subsection I.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 268 in subsection B, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “calendar” following “seven,” and inserted “for a recount of any election other than an election for presidential electors, or within five calendar days of the filing of a petition for a recount of an election for presidential electors,” inserted “or §

24.2-801.1

” in the first sentence of the third paragraph, and redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) in the next-to-last paragraph; and substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in subsection G.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, substituted “provisional” for “conditional” in clause (i) in the next-to-last paragraph in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 689, in the second paragraph of subsection C, in the fourth sentence, substituted “On the request of any party” for “On request of a party” and “that party” for “each party” and added the fifth sentence; inserted the language beginning “and any ballots for which” and ending “of this subdivision” and made a related change in the third sentence of subdivision D 4; and added the last sentence in the fourth paragraph of subdivision D 5.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 285 added the third paragraph of subsection A, and in the fourth paragraph of subsection B, redesignated clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) as (a), (b) and (c).

The 2007 amendments by cc. 939 and 943 are identical, and deleted “mechanical or” preceding “direct electronic voting device” in the second sentence in subsection B, in the first and fourth sentences in subsection C, and in the fourth sentence of the fourth full paragraph in subsection D; deleted the former fifth sentence in the first paragraph of subsection C, which read: “There shall be at least one team from each locality in the election district to redetermine the vote on other types of mechanical voting devices”; deleted former subdivision D 2 regarding mechanical lever machines; redesignated former subdivisions D 3 and D 4 as present subdivisions D 2 and D 3; deleted “mechanical lever machines with printouts and” near the beginning of subdivision D 2; and deleted subdivision D 5, pertaining to punchcard tabulators.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 682 in subdivision D 3, deleted “first examine the printout to redetermine the vote. Only if the printout is not clear, or on the request of the court, the recount officials shall” preceding “rerun all the ballots” in the first sentence, added the last two sentences and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 522 added the third sentence in subdivision D 3.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and substituted “machine” and “counting machine” for variations of “device” and inserted “recording” throughout the section; in the last paragraph of subsection A substituted “printed” for “paper”; in subsection C inserted “printed,” and substituted “printed” for “paper” and variations of “ballot scanner machines” for variations of “electronic counting devices”; in subdivision D 1 inserted “paper”; and in subdivision D 3 substituted “ballot scanner machines” for “optical scan tabulators” and “scanner” for “tabulator” throughout the subdivision, inserted “machine-readable” twice, and substituted “machine-readable” for “paper” following “total number of.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740, in the second sentence of the third paragraph of subsection B, added “Department, the” preceding “State” and “or agency” following “such boards”; and substituted “Department” for “State Board” in the third paragraph following subdivision D 3.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, substituted “voting systems” for “voting and counting machines” throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “voting system” for “counting machine” in clause (ii) of the first paragraph; in subsection B, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “As part of the preliminary hearing, the chief judge may permit the petitioner and his counsel, together with each other party and his counsel and at least two members of the electoral board and the custodians, to examine any direct recording electronic machine of the type that prints returns when the print-out sheets are not clearly legible” and deleted “also” preceding “have access” in the second sentence; in the first paragraph of subsection C, deleted “or in the case of direct recording electronic machines, to redetermine the vote” at the end of the first sentence and deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “There shall be at least one team of recount officials to recount printed ballots and to redetermine the vote cast on direct recording electronic machines of the type that prints returns for the election district at large in which the recount is being held”; deleted former subdivision D 2 pertaining to recounts of DRE votes and redesignated former subdivision D 3 as subdivision D 2; and, in the third paragraph of subdivision D 2, substituted “ballot scanners” for “direct recording electronic machines” in the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 382 inserted “and it shall issue a written order setting out such rules of procedure” in the third paragraph of subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 886, in subsection A, substituted “counting” for “determination” in clause (ii) in the first sentence and designated the last sentence as subsection C; inserted subsection B and transferred and rewrote the remaining text as §§

24.2-802.1

through

24.2-802.3

.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

No time limits. —

Losing candidate was not entitled to reconsideration of a recount hearing because the court received a written statement from a recount official challenging the disposition of a ballot, the only procedural consideration was that the parties be allowed to inspect the questioned ballots and the court hear argument prior to its certification, the failure to submit a written statement at a certain time did waive the recount official’s right to act, the questioned ballot included filled-in ovals for both candidates, and, since the line drawn through the losing candidate’s oval corresponded to the definition of a scratch, the ballot was counted as a vote for the other (winning) candidate. Simonds v. Yancey, 98 Va. Cir. 35, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 1 (Newport News Jan. 3, 2018).

§ 24.2-802.1.
Preliminary hearing; court to fix procedure for recount, appoint officers, and supervise the recount.

Within seven calendar days of the filing of the petition for a recount of any election other than an election for presidential electors, or within five calendar days of the filing of a petition for a recount of an election for presidential electors, the chief judge of the circuit court shall call a preliminary hearing at which (i) motions may be disposed of and (ii) the rules of procedure may be fixed, both subject to review by the full court. The petitioner and his counsel and each other party and their counsel under supervision of the electoral board and its agents shall have access to pollbooks and other materials used in the election for examination purposes, provided that individual ballots cast in the election shall not be examined at the preliminary hearing. The chief judge during the preliminary hearing shall review all security measures taken for all ballots and voting systems and direct, as he deems necessary, all appropriate measures to ensure proper security to conduct the recount.The chief judge, subject to review by the full court, may set the place for the recount and may order the delivery of election materials to a central location and the transportation of voting systems to a central location in each county or city under appropriate safeguards. These safeguards shall include prohibiting any person from knowingly possessing any firearm as defined in §

18.2-308.2:2

within 40 feet of any building or part thereof used as the place for the recount, unless such person is (a) any law-enforcement officer or any retired law-enforcement officer qualified pursuant to subsection C of §

18.2-308.016

; (b) occupying his own private property that falls within 40 feet of a polling place; or (c) an armed security officer, licensed pursuant to Article 4 (§

9.1-138

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1, whose employment or performance of his duties occurs within 40 feet of any building, or part thereof, used as a place for the recount.

After the full court is appointed under §

24.2-801

or

24.2-801.1

, it shall call a hearing at which all motions shall be disposed of and the rules of procedure shall be fixed finally, and it shall issue a written order setting out such rules of procedure. The court shall call for the advice and cooperation of the Department, the State Board, or any local electoral board, as appropriate, and such boards or agency shall have the duty and authority to assist the court. The court shall fix any additional procedures, that are not provided for in this chapter, that shall provide for the accurate counting of votes in the election. The recount procedures to be followed throughout the election district shall be as uniform as practicable, taking into account the types of ballots and voting systems in use in the election district.

The court shall permit each candidate, or petitioner and governing body or chief executive officer, to select an equal number of the officers of election to be recount officials and to count printed ballots. The number shall be fixed by the court and be sufficient to conduct the recount within a reasonable period. The court may permit each party to the recount to submit a list of alternate officials in the number the court directs. There shall be at least one team from each locality using ballot scanner machines to insert the ballots into one or more scanners. Each team shall be composed of one representative of each party.The court may provide that if, at the time of the recount, any recount official fails to appear, the remaining recount officials present shall appoint substitute recount officials who shall possess the same qualifications as the recount officials for whom they substitute. The court may select pairs of recount coordinators to serve for each county or city in the election district who shall be members of the county or city electoral board and represent different political parties. The court shall have authority to summon such officials and coordinators. On the request of any party to the recount, the court shall allow that party to appoint one representative observer for each team of recount officials. The representative observers shall have an unobstructed view of the work of the recount officials. The expenses of its representatives shall be borne by each party.

The court (i) shall supervise the recount and (ii) may require delivery of any or all pollbooks used and any or all ballots cast at the election, or may assume supervision thereof through the recount coordinators and officials.

History.

2020, c. 886; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 459.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 459, effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence in subsection A in the second paragraph.

§ 24.2-802.2.
General recount procedures.

For the purposes of this section:“Overvote” means a ballot on which a voter casts a vote for a greater number of candidates or positions than the number for which he was lawfully entitled to vote and no vote shall be counted with respect to that office or issue.“Undervote” means a ballot on which a voter casts a vote for a lesser number of candidates or positions than the number for which he was lawfully entitled to vote.

The recount of the votes shall be based on votes cast in the election and shall not take into account (i) any absentee ballots or provisional ballots sought to be cast but ruled invalid and not cast in the election, (ii) ballots cast only for administrative or test purposes and voided by the officers of election, or (iii) ballots spoiled by a voter and replaced with a new ballot.

The eligibility of any voter to have voted shall not be an issue in a recount. Commencing upon the filing of the recount, nothing shall prevent the discovery or disclosure of any evidence that could be used pursuant to §

24.2-803

in contesting the results of an election.

There shall be only one recount of the vote in each precinct. The recount of the vote shall be conducted as follows:

For paper ballots, the recount officials shall hand count the paper ballots using the standards promulgated by the State Board pursuant to §

24.2-802

.

For ballot scanner machines, the recount officials shall rerun all the machine-readable ballots through a scanner programmed to count only the votes for the parties or issue in question in the recount and to set aside all ballots containing write-in votes, overvotes, and undervotes. The ballots that are set aside, any ballots not accepted by the scanner, and any ballots for which a scanner could not be programmed to meet the programming requirements of this subdivision, shall be hand counted using the standards promulgated by the State Board pursuant to §

24.2-802

. If the total number of machine-readable ballots reported as counted by the scanner plus the total number of ballots set aside by the scanner do not equal the total number of ballots rerun through the scanner, then all ballots cast on ballot scanner machines for that precinct shall be set aside to be counted by hand using the standards promulgated by the State Board pursuant to § 24.2-802. Prior to running the machine-readable ballots through the ballot scanner machine, the recount officials shall ensure that logic and accuracy tests have been successfully performed on each scanner after the scanner has been programmed. The result calculated for ballots accepted by the ballot scanner machine during the recount shall be considered correct for those machine-readable ballots unless the court finds sufficient cause to rule otherwise.

Prior to the conclusion of the recount in each precinct, the recount officials shall segregate all ballots for which there is a question regarding the ballot’s validity.

At the conclusion of the recount of each precinct, the recount officials shall write down the number of valid ballots cast, this number being obtained from the ballots cast in the precinct, or from the ballots cast as shown on the statement of results if the ballots cannot be found, for each of the two candidates or for and against the question. They shall submit the ballots or the statement of results used, as to the validity of which questions exist, to the court. The written statement of any one recount official challenging a ballot shall be sufficient to require its submission to the court. If, on all ballot scanners, the number of persons voting in the election, or the number of votes cast for the office or on the question, totals more than the number of names on the pollbooks of persons voting on the voting machines, the figures recorded by the machines shall be accepted as correct.

At the conclusion of the recount of all precincts, after allowing the parties to inspect the questioned ballots, and after hearing arguments, the court shall rule on the validity of all questioned ballots and votes. The court may not consider the validity of any ballots not set aside prior to the conclusion of the recount in each precinct. After settling all matters pertaining to the recount of the vote as raised by the parties, the court shall certify to the State Board and the electoral board (i) the vote for each party to the recount and declare the person who received the higher number of votes to be nominated or elected, as appropriate, or (ii) the votes for and against the question and declare the outcome of the referendum. The Department shall post on the Internet any and all changes made during the recount to the results as previously certified by it pursuant to §

24.2-679

.

The recount proceeding shall be final and not subject to appeal.

Except in the case of a recount of an election for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, or Attorney General, or for elector of President or Vice President of the United States, if the court finds that each party to the recount has received an equal number of votes, it shall issue a writ promptly ordering a special election be held to determine which candidate is elected to the office.

History.

2020, cc. 284, 500, 886.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 886 amended §

24.2-802

and recodified portions of it in this section. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment by Acts 2020, c. 284 to former §

24.2-802

has been given effect in this section by inserting subdivision D 3 and the second sentence in subsection F.

Acts 2020, c. 886 amended §

24.2-802

and recodified portions of it in this section. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment by Acts 2020, c. 500 to former §

24.2-802

has been given effect in this section by adding subsection H.

§ 24.2-802.3.
Costs of the recount.

Costs of the recount shall be assessed against the counties and cities comprising the election district when (i) the candidate petitioning for the recount is declared the winner; (ii) the petitioners in a recount of a referendum win the recount; or (iii) there was between the candidate apparently nominated or elected and the candidate petitioning for the recount a difference of not more than one-half of one percent of the total vote cast for the two such candidates as determined by the State Board or electoral board prior to the recount. Otherwise the costs of the recount shall be assessed against the candidate petitioning for the recount or the petitioners in a recount of a referendum. If more than one candidate petitions for a recount, the court may assess costs in an equitable manner between the counties and cities and any such candidate if both are liable for costs under this subsection. Costs incurred to date shall be assessed against any candidate or petitioner who defaults or withdraws his petition.

The court shall appraise the costs of the recount subject to the following limitations: (i) no per diem payment shall be assessed for salaried election officials; (ii) no per diem payment to officers of election serving as recount officials shall exceed two-thirds of the per diem paid such officers by the county or city for service on election day; and (iii) per diem payments to alternates shall be allowed only if they serve.

Any petitioner who may be assessed with costs under subsection A shall post a bond with surety with the court in the amount of $10 per precinct in the area subject to recount. If the petitioner wins the recount, the bond shall not be forfeit. If the petitioner loses the recount, the bond shall be forfeit only to the extent of the assessed costs. If the assessed costs exceed the bond, he shall be liable for such excess.

History.

2020, c. 886.